Utah statutes.
62A-15-607.   Responsibility for cost of care.

(1)  The division shall estimate and determine, as nearly as possible, the actual expense per annum of caring for and maintaining a patient in the state hospital, and that amount or portion of that amount shall be assessed to and paid by the applicant, patient, spouse, parents, child or children who are of sufficient financial ability to do so, or by the guardian of the patient who has funds of the patient that may be used for that purpose.

(2)  In addition to the expenses described in Subsection (1), parents are responsible for the support of their child while the child is in the care of the state hospital pursuant to Title 78B, Chapter 12, Utah Child Support Act, and Title 62A, Chapter 11, Recovery Services.

